Maryland, session 2025, SB0857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–101.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Economically disadvantaged background” means a family whose
income is no more than 300% of the federal poverty guidelines.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0857*

SENATE BILL 857
(3) “Eligible young child” means a child:
(i) Who is from an economically disadvantaged background;
(ii) Whose parent or legal guardian seeks to enroll the child in a
publicly funded prekindergarten program established under this section; and
(iii) Who is 3 or 4 years old on September 1 of the school year in which
the parent or legal guardian seeks to enroll the child in a publicly funded prekindergarten
program established under this section.
(4) “Fund” means the Prekindergarten Expansion Fund.
(5) “Montessori school” has the meaning stated in § 6–127 of this article.
(6) “Program” means the Prekindergarten Expansion Grant Program.
(7) “Qualified provider” means:
(i) If partnering with a county board under a memorandum of
understanding, a State accredited or nationally accredited child care program or a
nonpublic school approved by the Department to provide prekindergarten services; and
(ii) A county board.
(b) (1) There is a grant program known as the Prekindergarten Expansion
Grant Program in the State.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to broaden the availability of
high–quality prekindergarten and school readiness services throughout the State for
children and their families in coordination with the expansion of publicly funded full–day
prekindergarten under the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future established under Subtitle 1A
of this title.
(3) The Department shall administer the Program.
(4) (i) The Program shall be a competitive grant program to provide
funds to qualified providers.
(ii) The Department shall take measures to achieve geographic
diversity among participating qualified providers.
(iii) Priority for participation in the Program shall be given to
qualified providers:
1. That are located in areas of the State that have an unmet
need for prekindergarten or comprehensive early childhood education services;

SENATE BILL 857 3
2. That include a plan for long–term sustainability, including
community and business partnerships and matching funds to the extent possible; and
3. That incorporate parental engagement and the benefits of
educational activities beyond the classroom into the providers’ programs.
(iv) Prekindergarten Expansion Grants may be used to [expand
prekindergarten services] ADD AVAILABLE SLOTS TO PROVIDE PREKINDERGARTEN
SERVICES TO ADDITIONAL CHILDREN, including:
1. Establishing or expanding full–day prekindergarten for
eligible young children; and
2. Expanding existing half–day prekindergarten programs
into full–day prekindergarten programs for eligible young children.
(v) The Department may establish:
1. Additional eligibility criteria for the selection of qualified
providers;
2. [Application] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (VI) AND
(VII) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, APPLICATION and award processes including the submission
date for applications, renewal procedures, and application review processes for making
awards under the Program; and
3. Any other policies and procedures necessary to implement
the Program.
(VI) 1. APPLICATIONS SHALL USE EASY–TO–UNDERSTAND
TERMINOLOGY AND BE ACCOMPANIED BY MULTILINGUAL INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW
TO COMPLETE THE APPLICATION.
2. APPLICATIONS FOR A GRANT UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL BE DUE ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 15.
3. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE GRANT
APPLICANTS WITH A NOTICE OF A GRANT AWARD OR GRANT DENIAL ON OR BEFORE
MARCH 1.
(VII) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A MULTIYEAR GRANT
AWARD PROCESS SO THAT RECIPIENTS WILL HAVE GREATER PREDICTABILITY AND
FINANCIAL STABILITY FROM YEAR TO YEAR.

SENATE BILL 857
(VIII) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE 100% OF THE GRANT
AMOUNT TO THE GRANT RECIPIENT ON OR BEFORE JULY 1.
(IX) 1. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE ON THE GRANT APPLICATION PROCESS AND REPORTING
REQUIREMENTS FOR GRANT RECIPIENTS TO:
A. MULTILINGUAL APPLICANTS;
B. FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDERS; AND
C. SMALL, INDEPENDENT CHILD CARE PROVIDERS.
2. TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE DEPARTMENT
MAY PROVIDE THE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE THROUGH A HUB MODEL UNDER §
7–1A–05 OF THIS TITLE.
3. THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH A THIRD
PARTY TO PROVIDE THE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, before approving
qualified providers for prekindergarten services to receive a grant under this section, a
qualified provider shall certify to the Department that for each classroom funded under
this section the provider will:
(i) Maintain a student–to–classroom personnel ratio of no more
than 10 to 1 with a maximum of 20 children per classroom;
(ii) Provide in each classroom at least one teacher and at least one
teacher’s aide who meet the high staff qualifications of § 7–1A–04(a)(1)(i) of this title;
(iii) Operate an educational program for:
1. 5 days per week;
2. 180 days per year, in accordance with the public school
calendar established by the local school board; and
3. A. For half–day programs, at least 2.5 hours per day;
or
B. For full–day programs, at least 6.5 hours per day; and
(iv) To receive a grant under this section, meet the requirements of §
7–1A–04 of this title.

SENATE BILL 857 5
(2) Before approving qualified providers who are Montessori schools or
Montessori programs for prekindergarten services to receive a grant under this section, a
qualified provider shall certify to the Department that for each classroom funded under
this section the provider will:
(i) Meet the requirements under paragraph (1)(iii) of this
subsection;
(ii) Maintain a student–to–classroom personnel ratio of no more
than 10 to 1, with a maximum of 20 students per classroom if all of the students are under
the age of 5 years;
(iii) Maintain a student–to–classroom personnel ratio of no more
than 14 to 1, with a maximum of 28 students per classroom if some of the students are at
least 5 years old; and
(iv) Require a classroom teacher to:
1. Hold a bachelor’s degree in any field; and
2. Hold a Montessori credential issued by:
A. The Association Montessori Internationale;
B. The American Montessori Society; or
C. A program accredited by the Montessori Accreditation
Council for Teacher Education.
(d) (1) (i) Beginning in fiscal year 2020 through fiscal year 2029, the
Governor shall annually appropriate to the Fund an amount that is at least equal to the
total amount of all funds received by the Program in the prior fiscal year.
(ii) Beginning in fiscal year 2030, the funds appropriated to the Fund
shall be consolidated into the publicly funded full–day prekindergarten program
established in Subtitle 1A of this title.
(2) The Governor may provide funds to the Department to administer the
Program.
(e) Grants awarded under this section may not be used:
(1) To supplant existing funding for prekindergarten services;
(2) For capital improvements; [or]

SENATE BILL 857
(3) To fund the same full–day prekindergarten slot that is funded under
Subtitle 1A of this title; OR
(4) TO SUPPLANT EXISTING CHILD CARE SLOTS FOR INFANTS AND
TODDLERS.
(f) The Department shall:
(1) Leverage Child Care Subsidy Program funds when making grant
awards to private providers that participate in the Child Care Subsidy Program;
(2) Encourage private providers that receive grants to pursue level 5 in the
Department’s voluntary quality rating and improvement system known as “Maryland
EXCELS”;
(3) Supervise and monitor the use of grant funds distributed under this
section; and
(4) Evaluate whether grant recipients are meeting annual benchmarks
established by the Department.
(g) (1) There is a Prekindergarten Expansion Fund.
(2) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funds to the Program.
(3) The Department shall administer the Fund.
(4) (i) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(5) The Fund consists of:
(i) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(ii) Investment earnings of the Fund; and
(iii) Any other money from any other source, including donations,
accepted for the benefit of the Fund.
(6) The Fund may be used only for grants made by the Department for the
Program.
(7) (i) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.

SENATE BILL 857 7
(ii) Investment earnings of the Fund shall be paid into the Fund.
(8) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the
State budget.
(h) In accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Department
shall report to the General Assembly by November 1 of each year on the implementation of
the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The State Department of Education shall convene a workgroup of child care
providers in the State to explore opportunities to incentivize growth in child care providers
with slots for infants and toddlers.
(b) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department shall report to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on
recommendations resulting from the workgroup.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.